Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2173
Liens upon undivided interests; lien for costs paramount.

If the lien is upon one or more undivided interests of any of the parties, it shall, after partition or sale, remain a charge upon those particular interests or the proceeds thereof. But the due proportion of costs is a charge upon those interests paramount to all other liens.

R.S.1867, Code § 805, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 8288;

C.S.1922, § 9241;

C.S.1929, § 20-2173;

R.S.1943, § 25-2173.

Proceeds are not exempt as personalty against judgment lien. First Nat. Bank of Albion v. Snyder, 2 Neb. Unof. 136, 96 N.W. 285 (1901).